Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0610.
people of the state of michigan enact: PART 95A UTERINE FIBROID DATABASE AND EDUCATION Sec. 9551. (1) As used in this part: (a) "Database" means the database established under section 9553. (b) "Health professional" means an individual licensed, registered, or otherwise authorized to engage in a health profession under article 15. (c) "Michigan board of medicine" means the board created under section 17021. (d) "Michigan board of osteopathic medicine and surgery" means the board created under section 17521. (2) In addition, article 1 contains general definitions and principles of construction applicable to all articles in this code. Sec. 9553. (1) The department shall establish and maintain an electronic database of information related to uterine fibroids to increase awareness about uterine fibroids and to ensure that women receive the information and health care necessary to prevent and treat the condition. The database must include all of the following information: (a) The incidence and prevalence of uterine fibroids in this state. (b) The demographic attributes of women diagnosed with uterine fibroids in this state. (c) Treatment and procedure options for uterine fibroids that are used by health professionals. (2) A health professional who diagnoses or treats a patient with uterine fibroids shall submit data for inclusion into the database in a form and manner required by the department by rule. (3) The department shall not include any personal identifying information of a patient in the database. Information contained in the database is subject to the same requirements of confidentiality as provided in section 2631 for data or records concerning medical research projects. (4) Within 2 years after the effective date of this section, the department shall begin evaluating the data collected pursuant to subsection (2) and publishing reports summarizing the data. The first summary report must be published not later than 180 days after the end of the first 2 full calendar years after the effective date of this section. Subsequent annual summary reports must be made on a full calendar year basis and published not later than 180 days after the end of each calendar year. Sec. 9554. (1) The department, in consultation with the Michigan board of medicine and the Michigan board of osteopathic medicine and surgery, shall promote public awareness and increase knowledge about uterine fibroids in this state by developing and disseminating educational materials that contain information on all of the following: (a) The race or ethnicity of women who have a statistically elevated risk of developing uterine fibroids. (b) The range of available treatment options for uterine fibroids, including treatment and procedure options that do not involve a hysterectomy. (c) Any other information that the department considers necessary or appropriate to educate the public and health professionals. (2) The department, on its website, shall make the information described in subsection (1) available to the public and to health professionals. The Michigan board of medicine and the Michigan board of osteopathic medicine and surgery shall also disseminate to health professionals the information described in this section. Sec. 9554a. The department shall enter into an agreement with nonprofit organizations, institutions of higher education, and other persons considered appropriate by the director, to develop and implement a public awareness campaign to disseminate information on all of the following to the public: (a) Uterine fibroids. (b) The risks associated with uterine fibroids. (c) Options other than a hysterectomy to treat uterine fibroids, including, but not limited to, drugs and devices that are approved under the federal food, drug, and cosmetic act, 21 USC 301 to 399i. Sec. 9555. The department may promulgate rules to implement this part. The rules may require a health professional to submit information to the department under this part in the same time frame and manner as a health professional submits other information to the department under section 5111.